Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.050

Pledge and promise—Remedies.

(1) Bonds issued under RCW 28A.527.010 shall state that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.

(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

[ 2008 c 179 s 206.]